Louisiana, session 2026, HB710.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:961(J) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§961. Cooperative endeavor agreements; withdrawal of surface water; intent
* * *
J.(1) The state shall be reimbursed at fair market value for all use or
withdrawal of running surface water from bodies of water managed by the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries and determined by the office of fisheries to be
negatively impacted by invasive aquatic vegetation. Fair market value as used in this
Subsection shall be at a rate of not more than fifteen cents per thousand gallons, and
shall not include the economic development, employment, and increased tax
revenues created by the activities associated with the withdrawal of running surface
water.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-780 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 710
(2)(a) In addition to the reimbursement required by Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, an assessment shall be paid on the surface water withdrawn from Lake
Bistineau to cover the annual costs, not to exceed one million dollars, of the
treatment and control of aquatic weeds on Lake Bistineau as determined by the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries.
(b) Amounts collected pursuant to this Paragraph shall be deposited into the
Aquatic Plant Control Dedicated Fund Account established in R.S. 56:10.1.
Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection K of this Section, all amounts
collected pursuant to this Paragraph shall be used solely for the treatment and control
of aquatic weeds on Lake Bistineau.